New York, session 2025-2026, A7196.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 502 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 1-a to read as follows: 3 1-a. License exchange for certain countries. (a) Notwithstanding any 4 provisions of this section, the commissioner shall accept as valid for 5 purposes of identification, age and examination a driver's license 6 issued from a country listed in paragraph (b) of this subdivision and 7 shall issue a license to drive in this state to an individual holding a 8 license described in paragraph (c) of this subdivision, provided howev- 9 er, the individual shall be subject to the written examination and the 10 vision test required by subdivision four of this section. 11 (b) A drivers license issued by the following countries or territories 12 shall be valid for purposes of paragraph (a) of this subdivision: 13 Anguilla, Antigua and Barbuda, Aruba, Bahamas, Barbados, Bonaire, Brit- 14 ish Virgin Islands, Cayman Islands, Cuba, Curacao, Dominica, Dominican 15 Republic, Grenada, Guadeloupe, Guyana, Haiti, Jamaica, Martinique, Mont- 16 serrat, Puerto Rico, Saba, Saint Barthelemy, Saint Kitts and Nevis, 17 Saint Lucia, Saint Martin, Saint Vincent and the Grenadines, Sint Eusta- 18 tius, Sint Maarten, Trinidad and Tobago, Turks and Caicos Islands, and 19 the Virgin Islands of the United States. 20 (c) A license issued by a country listed in paragraph (b) of this 21 subdivision shall be accepted for exchange if it: is valid or has 22 expired within the past six months; states the date upon which it was 23 issued and it was issued a minimum of six months prior to the date of 24 the application; and is not suspended, revoked, lost or stolen. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06056-01-5